Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3864
(UTC 708) Compensation of trustee.

(UTC 708) (a) If the terms of a trust do not specify the trustee's compensation, a trustee is entitled to compensation that is reasonable under the circumstances.

(b) If the terms of a trust specify the trustee's compensation, the trustee is entitled to be compensated as specified, but the court may allow more or less compensation if:

(1) the duties of the trustee are substantially different from those contemplated when the trust was created; or

(2) the compensation specified by the terms of the trust would be unreasonably low or high.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 64.